Arkansas, session 2025, HB1904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-18-208(1)–(3), concerning additional
penalties for failure to comply with the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, are
amended to read as follows:
(1) In the case of a taxpayer's failure to file any return
required by any state tax law on or before the date prescribed determined
with regard to any extension of time for filing the return, unless it is
shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect,
there shall be added to the amount required to be shown as tax on the return
five percent (5%) of the amount of the tax if the failure is not more than
one (1) month, with an additional five percent (5%) for each additional month
or fraction of a month during which the failure continues, not to exceed
thirty-five percent (35%) ten percent (10%) in the aggregate;
(2)(A) In case of a failure to pay the amount shown as tax on
any return required to be filed under any state tax law, except an individual
income tax return, on or before the date prescribed for payment of the tax,
unless it is shown that the failure to pay is due to reasonable cause and not
*JLL318*
03/31/2025 9:42:11 AM JLL318

HB1904
to willful neglect, there shall be added to the amount shown as tax on the
return five percent (5%) of the amount of the tax if the failure is for not
more than one (1) month, with an additional five percent (5%) for each
additional month or fraction of a month during which the failure continues,
not to exceed thirty-five percent (35%) ten percent (10%) in the aggregate.
(B) In case of failure to pay the amount shown as tax on
any individual income tax return required to be filed, on or before the date
prescribed for payment of the tax, unless it is shown that the failure to pay
is due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect, there shall be added
to the amount shown as tax on the return one percent (1%) of the amount of
the tax if the failure is for not more than one (1) month, with an additional
one percent (1%) for each additional month or fraction of a month during
which the failure continues, not to exceed thirty-five percent (35%) ten
percent (10%) in the aggregate;
(3)(A)(i) If any penalty is assessed under subdivision (1) of
this section, then no penalty shall be assessed under subdivision (2)(A) of
this section.
(ii) If any penalty is assessed under subdivision
(2)(A) of this section, then no penalty shall be assessed under subdivision
(1) of this section;
(B) With respect to any individual income tax return, the
amount of the addition under subdivision (1) of this section shall be
increased by the amount of the addition under subdivision (2)(B) of this
section for any month or fraction of a month to which an addition to tax
applies under both subdivisions (1) and (2)(B) of this section, not to exceed
thirty-five percent (35%) ten percent (10%) in the aggregate;










03/31/2025 9:42:11 AM JLL318